Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
General Provisions; Additions to and Deletions from State Highway System, 1954-1971
§ 65-3-3.
State highways designated.

The following highways are designated as state highways and shall be under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance, and such highways, along with all other laws adding links to the designated state highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi:

Mississippi 1 – Begins at Onward, Sharkey County, thence in a westerly direction to Filer, thence in a northerly direction to Mayersville, thence continues from Mississippi 14 approximately midway between Mayersville and Rolling Fork to or near Greenville, Rosedale, Sherard and ends at U.S. 49 east of Mississippi River Bridge at Helena, Coahoma County.

Mississippi 2 – Begins at or near Hickory Flat, Benton County, and extends in a northeasterly direction to or near Blue Mountain, thence continues from or near Ripley to or near Kossuth to U.S. 72 west of Corinth, thence from U.S. 45 north of Corinth, Alcorn County, northeasterly to the Mississippi-Tennessee state line.

Mississippi 3 – Begins at a point on U.S. 61 at or near Redwood, Warren County, and extends in a northeasterly direction to or near Satartia and Yazoo City, thence follows U.S. 49W to or near Inverness, thence in a northeasterly direction to Moorhead, thence north to Sunflower, thence continues along U.S. 49W to Tutwiler, thence in a northeasterly direction to Lambert, Marks, Sledge, Crenshaw, Sarah and Savage to intersect U.S. 61 at or near Lake Cormorant, DeSoto County.

Mississippi 4 – Begins at or near Fox Island and extends east to or near Tunica, Coahoma County, thence continues from U.S. 61 south of Tunica to or near Savage, Strayhorn, Senatobia, Holly Springs, and Ashland, thence continues from Mississippi 5 approximately six and one-half miles south of Ashland to or near Ripley, Booneville, Bentonite Mill, Livingstons Store, New Site, and Bay Springs to Mississippi 25 at or near Dennis.

Mississippi 5 – Begins on Mississippi 178 near Hickory Flat, Benton County, and extends north to Elvis Chapel Church on U.S. 72, and thence west on U.S. 72 to Harris Chapel Church and thence northwest to Mississippi 7, Benton County.

Mississippi 6 – Begins on Mississippi 161 in Clarksdale, thence easterly to Marks, Batesville, Oxford, Pontotoc, Tupelo, thence southerly to Nettleton and ends at its intersection with Mississippi 25 north of Amory.

Mississippi 7 – Begins at or near Belzoni, Humphreys County, and extends in a northeasterly direction to or near Swiftown to U.S. 82 north of Itta Bena, thence continues from or near Greenwood to or near Holcomb, Grenada, Coffeeville, Water Valley, Oxford and Holly Springs to the Mississippi-Tennessee state line northeast of Michigan City, Benton County.

Mississippi 8 – Begins on Mississippi 1 at or near Rosedale, Bolivar County, and extends in an easterly direction to or near Cleveland, Ruleville, Minter City, Philipp and Holcomb, thence continues from or near Grenada to or near Calhoun City, Houston and Aberdeen and ends on U.S. 278 at or near Greenwood Springs, Monroe County.

Mississippi 9 – Begins at or near Ackerman, Choctaw County, and extends in a northerly direction to or near eupora, Bellefontaine and Slate Springs to Mississippi 8 south of Calhoun City, thence continues from or near Calhoun City to or near Bruce, Sarepta, Pontotoc and Sherman, thence continuing from U.S. 78 northwest of Sherman to, at or near Blue Springs and ending at Mississippi 30 at or near Graham, Union County.

Mississippi 9W – Begins on Mississippi 9 north of Bruce, Calhoun County, and extends northerly to or near Banner and Paris to Mississippi 7 at Airport Road south of Markette, Lafayette County.

I-10 – From the Mississippi-Louisiana state line east of Slidell, Louisiana, to the Mississippi-Alabama state line southwest of Mobile, Alabama.

U.S. 11 – Begins on I-59 at or near Nicholson, south of Picayune, Pearl River County, and extends in a northeasterly direction to or near Picayune, Poplarville, Hattiesburg, Laurel, Enterprise and Meridian, and thence easterly to the Mississippi-Alabama state line, Lauderdale County.

Mississippi 12 – Begins on Mississippi 1 at or near James, Washington County, thence continuing through LeRoy Percy State Park and extends in an easterly direction to or near Hollandale, Belzoni, Tchula, Lexington, Durant, Kosciusko and Ackerman to a point on U.S. 82 north of Mississippi State University, thence continues from or near Columbus and extends in a northeasterly direction to the Mississippi-Alabama state line, Lowndes County.

Mississippi 13 – Begins at a point on U.S. 49 at or near Maxie, Forrest County, and extends in a northwesterly direction to or near Lumberton and Columbia, thence continues in a northerly direction to or near Prentiss, Mendenhall, Puckett, Daniel, Polkville, Morton and Lena and ends at a point on Mississippi 16 west of Carthage at or near Pine Tree, Leake County.

Mississippi 14 – Begins at or near Mayersville, Issaquena County, and extends in an easterly direction to or near Rolling Fork, thence continues from U.S. 61 at or near Anguilla to U.S. 49W at or near Louise, thence continues from, at or near Ebenezer to or near Goodman, Newport and Zemuly to south of Kosciusko to or near Louisville and Macon ending at the Mississippi-Alabama state line east of Macon, Noxubee County.

Mississippi 15 – Begins at the intersection of I-10 and I-110, Harrison County, and extends in a northerly direction to or near Beaumont, Laurel, Bay Springs, Newton, Philadelphia, Louisville, Ackerman, Mathiston, Houston, Pontotoc, New Albany, Ripley, Walnut and ends at the Mississippi-Tennessee state line, Tippah County.

Mississippi 16 – Begins on Mississippi 1 at or near the Issaquena-Washington county line, thence in a southeasterly direction to Rolling Fork and extends in a southeasterly direction near Little Sunflower River, thence continues from or near Holly Bluff in a northeasterly direction to U.S. 49W at or near Craig, thence continues from or near Yazoo City to or near Benton to U.S. 51 at or near Canton, thence continues to or near Carthage, Philadelphia, Dekalb and Scooba to the Mississippi-Alabama state line east of Scooba, Kemper County.

Mississippi 17 – Begins in Scott County on designated Mississippi 25, thence northerly to Mississippi 16 near Farmhaven, thence to or near Pickens, Lexington, Carrollton and ends approximately three and one-tenth miles northeast of North Carrollton, Carroll County.

Mississippi 18 – Begins at or near Grand Gulf, Claiborne County, then to or near Port Gibson and extends in a northeasterly direction to or near Hermanville, Utica and Raymond to an intersection with U.S. 80 at or near Jackson, thence from Brandon continues in a southeasterly direction to or near Raleigh and Bay Springs, thence continues in a northeasterly direction to or near Rose Hill, thence southeast to or near Pachuta, thence east to or near Quitman and ends at the Mississippi-Alabama state line east of Quitman, Clarke County.

Mississippi 19 – Begins on U.S. 51 at or near West, Holmes County, and extends in a southeasterly direction to or near Kosciusko, Zama, Arlington High School, Yates Crossing, Philadelphia and Meridian, and ends at the Mississippi-Alabama state line southeast of Meridian, Lauderdale County.

I-20 – From the Mississippi-Louisiana state line at Vicksburg to a point on I-55 in Jackson and from another point on I-55 southeast of Jackson to a point on I-59 west of Meridian.

Mississippi 21 – Begins at a point on Mississippi 35 at or near Forest, Scott County, and runs in a northeasterly direction to or near Sebastopol, Dixon, Neshoba County Fairgrounds, Philadelphia, Bond High School, Preston, Gholson, thence in a northeasterly direction to intersect Mississippi 39 at or near Shuqualak, Noxubee County.

Mississippi 22 – Begins at or near Edwards, Hinds County, thence in a northeasterly direction to or near Flora, thence to a point on U.S. 51 at or near Canton, Madison County.

Mississippi 23 – Begins on Mississippi 25 at or near Smithville in Monroe County, thence northerly to Tremont, thence to the Mississippi-Alabama state line, Itawamba County, southeast of Golden, Mississippi.

Mississippi 24 – Begins at or near Fort Adams, Wilkinson County, and extends in an easterly direction to or near Woodville, Centreville, Gloster, Liberty and McComb, Pike County.

Mississippi 25 – Begins at or near Jackson, Hinds County, thence in a northeasterly direction to or near Carthage, Louisville and Starkville, thence along U.S. 82 to its intersection with U.S. 45A, thence along U.S. 45A to Muldon, thence to or near Aberdeen, Amory, Smithville, to U.S. 78, thence continuing to Belmont, Dennis, Tishomingo, Iuka and to the Mississippi-Tennessee state line north of Cross Roads, Tishomingo County.

Mississippi 26 – Begins at the Mississippi-Louisiana state line east of Bogalusa, Pearl River County, and extends in an easterly direction to or near Poplarville and Wiggins and ends at or near Lucedale, George County.

Mississippi 27 – Begins on the Mississippi-Louisiana state line south of Tylertown, Walthall County, and extends northerly to Tylertown, Monticello, Georgetown, Crystal Springs, Utica and ends at or near Vicksburg, Warren County.

Mississippi 28 – Begins at or near Fayette, Jefferson County, and extends to, at or near Hazlehurst, Georgetown, Pinola, Magee and Taylorsville and ends on U.S. 84 west of Laurel, Jones County.

Mississippi 29 – Begins at or near Wiggins, Stone County, and extends in a northerly direction to or near Janice, New Augusta, Runnelstown, Ellisville and ends at Mississippi 28 at or near Soso, Jones County.

Mississippi 30 – Begins at or near Oxford, Lafayette County, and extends in a northeasterly direction to or near New Albany, thence by Keownsville and Pleasant Ridge, thence to a point at or near Wheeler to intersect U.S. 45, thence along U.S. 45 to south of Booneville, thence from U.S. 45 northeasterly to intersect Mississippi 4 and Mississippi 364, thence to Walden’s Store, Hills Chapel, Burton and ends at the Natchez Trace Parkway east of Tishomingo, Tishomingo County.

Mississippi 32 – Begins on Mississippi Highway 1 at or near Perthshire, Bolivar County, and extends east to or near Shelby, thence continues from U.S. 49W at or near Parchman easterly to or near Webb, Charleston, Oakland, Water Valley, Bruce and Houlka, thence continues from Mississippi 15 south of Houlka to or near Van Vleet and Okolona, Chickasaw County.

Mississippi 33 – Begins at the Mississippi-Louisiana state line, Wilkinson County, and extends northerly to Mississippi 24 at or near Centreville, thence to Gloster to or near Crosby, Knoxville, Roxie and McNair to U.S. 61 south of Fayette, then from or near Fayette northeasterly to or near Red Lick and Pattison to Mississippi 18 at or near Hermanville, Claiborne County.

Mississippi 35 – Begins at the Mississippi-Louisiana state line, Marion County, south of Sandy Hook and extends in a northerly direction to a point on U.S. 98 at or near Foxworth, thence continues from or near Columbia to or near Bassfield, Lone Star, Mount Olive, Mize, Raleigh, Forest, Carthage, Kosciusko, Vaiden, Holcomb, Charleston and Batesville and ends at or near the Sardis Dam northeast of Batesville, Panola County.

Mississippi 37 – Begins at a point on U.S. 84, Covington County, south of Hot Coffee and extends in a northerly direction to or near Taylorsville, Center Ridge and ends on Mississippi 35 south of Raleigh, Smith County.

Mississippi 39 – Begins at or near Meridian, Lauderdale County, and extends in a northerly direction to or near DeKalb and ends on U.S. 45 at or near Shuqualak, Noxubee County.

Mississippi 41 – Begins at or near Pontotoc, Pontotoc County, and extends southeasterly to or near Okolona, thence easterly to U.S. 45 at or near Wren, Monroe County.

Mississippi 42 – Begins at the Lawrence-Simpson county line northeast of New Hebron and extends to or near New Hebron, Prentiss, Bassfield and Sumrall to U.S. 49 north of Hattiesburg to or near Petal, Runnelstown, Richton, Sand Hill and State Line to the Mississippi-Alabama state line, Wayne County.

Mississippi 43 – Begins on U.S. 90 west of Bay St. Louis, Hancock County, and extends in a north northwesterly direction to or near Picayune, thence continues from or near Picayune to Mississippi 26 at or near Cross Roads then to Mississippi 13 south of Prentiss west and north to Arm Road in Section 5, Township 6 North, Range 20 West, Lawrence County, and proceeds northwesterly for approximately four miles to its intersection with U.S. 84 in Section 24, Township 7 North, Range 21 West, thence continues from, at or near Silver Creek, New Hebron and Pinola to Mississippi 13 southwest of Mendenhall, thence continues from Mississippi 18 at or near Puckett, Cross Roads, Pelahatchie and Pisgah to Mississippi 16 at or near Canton, thence to or near Thomastown, Kosciusko, Shady Grove and Friendship ending at the intersection of Mississippi 407 south of Kilmichael, Montgomery County.

Mississippi 44 – Begins at or near McComb, Pike County, and extends to or near Pricedale and Jayess to Mississippi 27 east of Jayess, thence continues easterly across the Pearl River to Mississippi 13, Marion County, thence continues from, at or near Columbia to or near Sumrall, Lamar County.

U.S. 45 – Begins at the Mississippi-Alabama state line at or near the Town of State Line, Greene County, and extends in a northerly direction to or near Waynesboro, Quitman, Meridian, Scooba, Macon, Brooksville, Columbus, Aberdeen, Nettleton, Shannon, Tupelo, Booneville, Corinth and ends at the Mississippi-Tennessee state line north of Corinth, Alcorn County.

U.S. 45A – Begins at a point on U.S. 45 at or near Brooksville, Noxubee County, and extends in a northerly direction to or near West Point, Okolona, and ends at a point on U.S. 45 at or near Shannon, Lee County.

Mississippi 46 – Begins at a point on Mississippi 9 south of Calhoun City, Calhoun County, and extends southeasterly to or near Hohenlinden, Mantee, Montpelier to Mississippi 50 approximately seven miles west of West Point, Clay County.

Mississippi 47 – Begins at approximately seven miles west of West Point, Clay County, on Mississippi 50 and runs in a northerly direction to intersect with Mississippi 8 at or near Trebloc, and thence north to Buena Vista, Chickasaw County.

Mississippi 48 – Begins at or near Centreville, Wilkinson County, and extends to Liberty, thence continues from Mississippi 24 west of McComb and extends in a southeasterly direction to or near Magnolia, Tylertown and Dexter, thence continues in a southeasterly direction to intersect with Mississippi 35 at Sandy Hook, thence in an easterly direction to or near Lumberton, Lamar County.

U.S. 49 – Begins at or near Gulfport, Harrison County, and extends in a northerly direction to or near Wiggins, Hattiesburg, Collins, Mendenhall, Jackson and Yazoo City, thence continues from or near Tutwiler to or near Clarksdale, and thence continues from U.S. 61 north of Clarksdale westward to or near the Mississippi River, Coahoma County, near Helena, Arkansas.

U.S. 49E – Begins at or near Yazoo City, Yazoo County, and extends in a northerly direction to or near Tchula and Greenwood and ends at or near Tutwiler, Tallahatchie County.

U.S. 49W – Begins at or near Yazoo City, Yazoo County, and extends in a northerly direction to or near Belzoni, Indianola and Ruleville and ends at or near Tutwiler, Tallahatchie County.

Mississippi 50 – Begins at or near Walthall, Webster County, thence easterly to or near Cumberland to Mississippi 15, thence to or near Pheba, Cedar Bluff and West Point to or near junction Mississippi 373 and U.S. 45, then continues from, at or near Columbus on U.S. 82 northeasterly to the Mississippi-Alabama state line, Lowndes County.

U.S. 51 – Begins at the Mississippi-Louisiana state line at or near Osyka, Pike County, and extends in a northerly direction to or near Magnolia, McComb, Summit, Brookhaven, Hazlehurst, Crystal Springs, Jackson, Canton, Durant, Winona, Grenada, Batesville, Senatobia and Hernando and ends at the Mississippi-Tennessee state line north of Horn Lake, DeSoto County.

Mississippi 53 – Begins at or near Poplarville, Pearl River County, and extends in a southeasterly direction to or near Necaise and ends at or near Lyman, Harrison County.

I-55 – From the Mississippi-Louisiana state line south of McComb via Jackson to the Mississippi-Tennessee state line south of Memphis, Tennessee.

Mississippi 57 – Begins at or near Fontainebleau, Jackson County, and extends to or near Vancleave, Benndale, Avent, and McLain, thence continues from U.S. 98 east of McLain to or near Leakesville, thence continues from or near Leakesville northerly to or near State Line on U.S. 45 and ends at its intersection with Mississippi 42, Greene County.

I-59 – From the Mississippi-Louisiana state line near Picayune via Hattiesburg, Laurel and Meridian to the Mississippi-Alabama state line west of Cuba, Alabama.

U.S. 61 – Begins at the Mississippi-Louisiana state line south of Woodville, Wilkinson County, and extends in a northerly direction to or near Woodville, Natchez, Fayette, Port Gibson, Vicksburg, Rolling Fork, Leland, Cleveland, Clarksdale and Tunica and ends at the Mississippi-Tennessee state line north of Lake View, DeSoto County.

Mississippi 63 – Begins from U.S. 90 at or near Pascagoula, Jackson County, and extends in a northerly direction to or near Moss Point, Wade, Lucedale, Leakesville, Sand Hill and ends at or near Waynesboro, Wayne County.

U.S. 65 – Begins at the west end of the Mississippi River Bridge at Natchez, Adams County, and extends in an easterly direction to U.S. 61 and thence continues south jointly with U.S. 61 to the Mississippi-Louisiana state line south of Woodville, Wilkinson County.

Mississippi 67 – Begins at I-10 and extends north to U.S. 49 at or near Saucier, all in Harrison County.

Mississippi 69 – Begins at the Mississippi-Alabama state line and extends northerly to or near Columbus, all in Lowndes County.

U.S. 72 – Begins at the Mississippi-Tennessee state line northwest of Mt. Pleasant, Marshall County, and extends in a southeasterly direction to or near Walnut, Corinth and Iuka and ends at the Mississippi-Alabama state line southeast of Iuka, Tishomingo County.

Mississippi 76 – Begins on Mississippi 6 west of Pontotoc to Mississippi 9, from Mississippi 9 easterly to U.S. 45 south of Tupelo and continuing easterly to existing Mississippi 6 near Plantersville, and continues from a point approximately 7.482 miles northeast of U.S. 78 near the community of Fairview and extends northeasterly approximately 11 miles to the Mississippi-Alabama state line, Itawamba County.

U.S. 78 – Begins at the Mississippi-Tennessee state line northwest of Olive Branch, DeSoto County, and extends in a southeasterly direction to or near Holly Springs, New Albany, Tupelo and Fulton and ends at the Mississippi-Alabama state line east of Fulton, Itawamba County.

U.S. 80 – Begins at or near Vicksburg, Warren County, and extends in an easterly direction to or near Jackson, Brandon, Forest, Newton and Meridian and ends at the Mississippi-Alabama state line east of Meridian, Lauderdale County.

U.S. 82 – Begins at the Mississippi River Bridge southwest of Greenville, Washington County, and extends in a northeasterly direction to or near Greenville, thence east to or near Leland, Indianola, Greenwood, Carrollton, Winona, Mathiston and Starkville to a point on U.S. 45 west of Columbus, thence continues from or near Columbus to the Mississippi-Alabama state line east of Columbus, Lowndes County.

U.S. 84 – Begins at the Mississippi River Bridge at or near Natchez, Adams County, and extends in an easterly direction to U.S. 61 in Natchez, thence continues jointly with U.S. 61 to or near Washington, thence continues from U.S. 61 at or near Washington, to or near Meadville, Brookhaven, Monticello, Prentiss, Collins, Laurel and Waynesboro to the Mississippi-Alabama state line east of Tokio, Wayne County.

U.S. 90 – Begins at the Mississippi-Louisiana state line southwest of Pearlington, Hancock County, and extends in an easterly direction to or near Bay St. Louis, Gulfport, Biloxi, Pascagoula, and ends at the Mississippi-Alabama state line, Jackson County, en route to Mobile, Alabama.

U.S. 98 – Begins at or near Bude, Franklin County, and extends in a southeasterly direction to or near Summit, thence continues from, at or near McComb to or near Tylertown, Columbia and Hattiesburg, thence continues from I-59 southwest of Hattiesburg to or near New Augusta, Beaumont, McLain and Lucedale to the Mississippi-Alabama state line southeast of Lucedale, George County.

I-110 – Begins at its intersection with U.S. 90 in Biloxi thence north to I-10.

Mississippi 145 – The various sections of Old U.S. 45 that have been relocated by new construction.

Mississippi 149 – The various sections of Old U.S. 49 that have been relocated by new construction.

Mississippi 161 – The various sections of Old U.S. 61 that have been relocated by new construction.

Mississippi 172 – The various sections of Old U.S. 72 that have been relocated by new construction.

Mississippi 178 – The various sections of Old U.S. 78 that have been relocated by new construction.

Mississippi 182 – The various sections of Old U.S. 82 that have been relocated by new construction.

Mississippi 184 – The various sections of Old U.S. 84 that have been relocated by new construction.

Mississippi 198 – The various sections of Old U.S. 98 that have been relocated by new construction.

Mississippi 245 – Begins on U.S. 45A south of Okolona, Chickasaw County, thence continues to Mississippi 32/Mississippi 41 at Okolona and continues to Mississippi 145 at Shannon, Lee County.

I-220 – Begins at its intersection with I-20 at or near Van Winkle and thence northeasterly a distance of approximately 12 miles to intersect with I-55 at or near the Hinds-Madison county line.

U.S. 278 – Begins at the Mississippi-Arkansas state line, continues along U.S. 82 to Leland, thence along U.S. 61 to Clarksdale, continues along Mississippi 6 to Batesville, Oxford, Pontotoc and Tupelo, thence along U.S. 45 to south of Nettleton, near Wren, thence easterly to Amory and ends at the Mississippi-Alabama state line near Gattman, Monroe County.

Mississippi 301 – Begins at or near Arkabutla, Tate County, thence north to the Tate-DeSoto county line, thence begins on Mississippi 304 at Eudora to or near Lynchburg and ends at the Mississippi-Tennessee state line, DeSoto County.

Mississippi 302 – Begins at U.S. 61, DeSoto County, thence east to U.S. 78 at or near Olive Branch in DeSoto County, thence to U.S. 72 at or near Mount Pleasant in Marshall County.

Mississippi 304 – Begins at the Mississippi-Tennessee state line at or near U.S. 72, Marshall County, and thence runs in a southwesterly direction to intersect with U.S. 78 at or near Byhalia and thence runs in a westerly direction to intersect I-55 at or near Hernando and thence runs in a westerly direction to intersect with U.S. 61 in DeSoto County.

Mississippi 305 – Begins at or near the north boundary line of Sardis Reservoir, Lafayette County, and extends northerly to Mississippi 310 in Lafayette County, then from Mississippi 4 north to or near Independence, Lewisburg, Olive Branch and ends at the Mississippi-Tennessee state line, DeSoto County.

Mississippi 306 – Begins at or near Coldwater and extends to or near Independence, all in Tate County.

Mississippi 309 – Begins on Mississippi 4 at or near Chulahoma, Marshall County, Mississippi, and runs thence in a northerly direction to or near the communities of Watson, the Town of Byhalia, and ends at the Mississippi-Tennessee state line north of Barton, Marshall County.

Mississippi 310 – Begins on Mississippi 3 in Crenshaw, Panola County, and extends in an easterly direction to Como, then returns from I-55 easterly to the Lafayette county line near Laws Hill, then to Mississippi 7 at or near Malone, Marshall County.

Mississippi 311 – Begins on Mississippi 7 at or near Holly Springs and extends northerly to U.S. 72 at or near Mt. Pleasant, all in Marshall County.

Mississippi 313 – Begins at or near Hudsonville and extends westerly to Atway, thence northerly to U.S. 72 at or near Slayden, all in Marshall County.

Mississippi 314 – Begins at or near Sardis Reservoir and extends southeasterly to or near Oxford, all in Lafayette County.

Mississippi 315 – Begins at U.S. Highway 49/Mississippi 61 near the Town of Rich, continues to the Coahoma-Quitman county line, thence easterly to or near Sledge and Sardis, southeasterly to or near Sardis Dam and Water Valley to Mississippi 9W at or near Paris, Lafayette County.

Mississippi 316 – Begins at a point on U.S. 61 in Coahoma County, at or near Frank Montory’s Place and runs thence in a generally southeasterly direction through Jonestown, thence through Belen to Mississippi 6 west of Marks, Quitman County.

Mississippi 321 – Begins on Mississippi 32 east of Webb and extends northerly and ends at or near Brazil, all in Tallahatchie County.

Mississippi 322 – Begins at or near Sherard, Coahoma County, and extends east to or near Clarksdale, thence from or near Hopson on U.S. 49 south of Clarksdale east to Mississippi 3 approximately three miles south of Lambert, thence from Lambert to Crowder and ends on the Batesville-Charleston Road east of Crowder, Panola County.

Mississippi 328 – Begins where it intersects with Mississippi 315, and extends easterly in a direction approximately eight miles to or near Taylor, thence to or near Markette, Lafayette County.

Mississippi 330 – Begins on U.S. 51 west of Tillatoba, Yalobusha County, and extends easterly to or near Coffeeville and Gums, thence east to Bruce, Calhoun County.

Mississippi 331 – Begins on Mississippi 9 southwest of Sarepta, Calhoun County, and extends north to or near Tula and ends on Mississippi 334 north of Tula, Lafayette County.

Mississippi 332 – Begins at the intersection of Old Mississippi 7 with U.S. 51 approximately one mile north of Grenada and extends in a northeasterly direction to the north abutment of the Grenada Dam, all in Grenada County.

Mississippi 333 – Begins at the intersection of Old Mississippi 8 with new Mississippi 8, approximately one mile east of Grenada and extends in a northeasterly direction to its intersection with a federally maintained road leading to the south abutment of the Grenada Dam, all in Grenada County.

Mississippi 334 – Begins at or near Oxford, Lafayette County, and extends in an easterly direction to or near Toccopola and ends on Mississippi 9 at or near Springville, Pontotoc County.

Mississippi 336 – Begins on Mississippi 6 at or near Lafayette Springs, Lafayette County, and extends to or near Thaxton and Pontotoc, Pontotoc County.

Mississippi 340 – Begins at the Calhoun-Chickasaw county line near the Riley Ball Home, thence easterly to Mississippi 341, then continues to Mississippi 15 near Woodland, all in Chickasaw County.

Mississippi 341 – Begins at the Webster-Chickasaw county line, thence northerly to or near Atlanta, Vardaman to Mississippi 32, then continues to or near Buckhorn ending on Mississippi 9 southwest of Pontotoc, Pontotoc County.

Mississippi 342 – Begins on Mississippi 41 at or near Pontotoc and extends to Mississippi 6 east of Pontotoc, all in Pontotoc County.

Mississippi 345 – Begins at or near Pontotoc and extends north and west to or near Ecru, all in Pontotoc County.

Mississippi 346 – Begins at or near Sand Springs Church, thence east to or near Esperanza, thence to Mississippi 15 approximately three-fourths mile south of Ecru, all in Pontotoc County.

Mississippi 347 – Begins on Mississippi 349 at or near Bethlehem, thence northeasterly and northwesterly to Mississippi 349 approximately two miles south of Potts Camp, all in Marshall County.

Mississippi 348 – Begins at or near New Albany, Union County, and extends east to or near Guntown, Lee County.

Mississippi 349 – Begins where it intersects with Mississippi 30, Union County, and extends northwesterly to or near Cornersville and Bethlehem and ends at or near Potts Camp, Marshall County.

Mississippi 350 – Begins from Mississippi 2 northeast of Corinth, Alcorn County, thence in an easterly direction to Mississippi 25 near the State Line Resort, Tishomingo County.

Mississippi 351 – Begins on the Alcorn-Tippah county line thence north to or near Gorforth’s Place on Mississippi 2 in Alcorn County.

Mississippi 354 – Begins at or near Walnut, thence in a southeasterly direction approximately two and nine-tenths miles, all in Tippah County.

Mississippi 355 – Begins at Mississippi 346 near Esperanza, Pontotoc County, and extends northwesterly to or near Pinedale and Etta, then to Mississippi 30 near Gallway, Union County.

Mississippi 356 – Begins on the Kossuth-Rienzi Road, Alcorn County, approximately six and one-half miles west of Rienzi and extends east to or near Rienzi and Jacinto, to intersect Mississippi 365 southeast of Jacinto, Prentiss County.

Mississippi 362 – Begins at Mississippi 145, runs through Wheeler to Wheeler School, thence from Hopewell Road easterly to intersect at or near the junction with a county road in the northwest quarter of Section 20 approximately one and four-tenths miles west of Mississippi 371, all in Prentiss County.

Mississippi 363 – Begins on Mississippi 178 west of Fulton, Itawamba County, and extends north to or near Mantachie, thence north and west to Mississippi 145 at Saltillo, Lee County.

Mississippi 364 – Begins on Mississippi 30 east of Booneville, Prentiss County, runs northeast to Mississippi 365 and thence from a point near Holcut east to Mississippi 25 south of Iuka, Tishomingo County.

Mississippi 365 – Begins on Mississippi 30 at or near Burton, Prentiss County, thence north to Burnsville to intersect Mississippi 25 at or near Cross Roads, Tishomingo County.

Mississippi 366 – Begins east of Baldwyn on Mississippi 370, Prentiss County, thence in an easterly direction to Mississippi 371 at Marietta, thence from Mississippi 25 at or near Belmont to the Mississippi-Alabama state line east of Golden, Tishomingo County.

Mississippi 367 – Begins on Mississippi 356 southeast of Jacinto, thence in a northeasterly direction to Alcorn-Tishomingo county line, all in Alcorn County.

Mississippi 368 – Begins where it intersects Mississippi 15 at or near Blue Mountain thence easterly to or near Buena Vista School, all in Tippah County.

Mississippi 369 – Begins on Mississippi 370 approximately two miles east of Benton-Tippah county line, thence northeasterly to or near Walnut, all in Tippah County.

Mississippi 370 – Begins at Mississippi 5 at or near Ashland, Benton County, thence easterly to Mississippi 15 at or near Falkner, thence from Mississippi 4 at or near Ripley southeasterly to or near Dumas thence to Mississippi 30 at or near Pleasant Ridge, thence from Mississippi 30 east of Pleasant Ridge to or near Baldwyn and ends at Mississippi 371 at or near Kirkville, Itawamba County.

Mississippi 371 – Begins on Mississippi 6 south of Nettleton, Monroe County, thence north to or near Richmond and Mooreville, thence northeast to or near Mantachie, thence north to or near Marietta and ends on Mississippi 4 southeast of Booneville, Prentiss County.

Mississippi 373 – Begins on U.S. 45 approximately four miles north of Columbus, Lowndes County, thence to the South Gate of Columbus Air Force Base, thence from the North Gate of Columbus Air Force Base to U.S. 45 at or near Hamilton, Monroe County.

Mississippi 379 – Begins at the Itawamba-Monroe county line and extends northward to a point on Mississippi 371 near Evergreen, all in Itawamba County.

Mississippi 382 – Begins on U.S. 45A and thence runs in an easterly direction through Prairie to intersect Mississippi 25 approximately three miles south of Aberdeen, all in Monroe County.

Mississippi 385 – Begins at or near Buena Vista and runs in a northwesterly direction to Mississippi 32 at or near Van Vleet, all in Chickasaw County.

Mississippi 388 – Begins at or near Brooksville and extends east to or near Cliftonville and to the Mississippi-Alabama state line, all in Noxubee County.

Mississippi 389 – Begins on U.S. 82 in Starkville, Oktibbeha County, and runs in a northwesterly direction to the Oktibbeha-Clay county line, thence to a point on Mississippi 46 at Montpelier, continues in a northerly direction to a point on Mississippi 8 in Houston, Chickasaw County.

Mississippi 391 – Begins at the east side of T. N. Kinard property line and runs in a northeasterly direction to Winston-Noxubee county line, all in Winston County.

Mississippi 393 – Begins on the Winston-Neshoba county line and extends northward to Mississippi 490 at or near Claytown, Winston County.

Mississippi 395 – Begins on Mississippi 19 at or near Arlington, Neshoba County, and runs north to Plattsburg, thence east to or near Noxapater, Winston County.

Mississippi 397 – Begins at or near Louisville, Winston County, and extends southeast to or near DeKalb, Kemper County.

Mississippi 403 – Begins at or near Mathiston and extends north and west to the county highway maintenance barn for District No. 4 in Webster County.

Mississippi 404 – Begins at I-55 in Carroll County and extends east to U.S. 51 north of Duck Hill, thence from a point on U.S. 51 at Duck Hill in an easterly direction to beat line of Beat No. 2 in Montgomery County and from the intersection of Cadaretta-Bellefontaine Road at Spring Hill, and extends easterly to or near Bellefontaine in Webster County.

Mississippi 407 – Begins on U.S. 51, Montgomery County, thence in a southeasterly direction to Mississippi 413 at French Camp, then from Mississippi 12 at or near Weir southwesterly to the Town of McCool, thence west to intersect Mississippi 12, Attala County.

Mississippi 411 – Begins at a point at or near Glendale School on Mississippi 14 in Attala County, Mississippi, and runs in a northerly direction to or near Antioch Church, thence to the Town of McCool, continues over the business route of Mississippi 12 through the Town of McCool to a point just west of the bridge over the Yockanookany River, thence north to Mississippi 12, all in Attala County.

Mississippi 413 – Begins at or near Kilmichael, Montgomery County, and extends southeast to or near Weir, Choctaw County.

Mississippi 415 – Begins where it intersects the Natchez Trace Parkway, thence southeast to or near Chester, and ends on Mississippi 9 about two and one-half miles northwest of Ackerman, Choctaw County.

Mississippi 424 – Begins at or near Holmes State Park and extends east to U.S. 51 south of Durant, Holmes County.

Mississippi 425 – Begins at a point on Mississippi 12 and runs in a southeasterly direction to the east city limits of Ethel, all in Attala County.

Mississippi 427 – Begins at or near Laurel Hill, Neshoba County, and extends in a northerly direction to Mississippi 16 at Edinburg, then begins approximately two miles north of Edinburg and extends in a northerly direction to Mississippi 25 between Marydell, Leake County, and Mississippi 19 intersection.

Mississippi 429 – Begins at or near Blocker’s Store, Leake County, and extends northwest to intersect the Natchez Trace Parkway at or near Thomastown, thence northerly to Mississippi 14 at or near Zemuly, thence from Mississippi 14 at or near Newport north to intersect Mississippi 12 north of Sallis, Attala County.

Mississippi 430 – Begins at or near Greenwood, Leflore County, thence in a southeasterly direction to Leflore-Carroll county line, thence from a point at or near Black Hawk east to or near Vaiden, Carroll County.

Mississippi 431 – Begins in the Village of Sallis, Attala County, 600 feet west of Mississippi 429 and extends easterly to Mississippi 12 east of Sallis.

Mississippi 432 – Begins at or near Benton, Yazoo County, and extends northeast to or near Pickens, Holmes County.

Mississippi 433 – Begins on U.S. 61 at or near Kelso, Sharkey County, thence northeast to a point south of Spanish Fort, and thence from, at or near Satartia, east to or near Bentonia, thence in a northerly direction to or near Benton, and thence to a point approximately four miles north of the Holmes-Yazoo county line.

Mississippi 434 – Begins on U.S. 61 north of Anguilla and extends east to or near Catchings, now Delta City, all in Sharkey County.

Mississippi 436 – Begins at or near Glen Allen and extends northeasterly to U.S. 61 at or near Percy, all in Washington County.

Mississippi 438 – Begins at or near Wayside, Washington County, and extends to the Washington-Humphreys county line.

Mississippi 440 – Begins on Mississippi 19 in Section 2, Township 15 North, Range 5 East, thence easterly to intersect Mississippi 35 at Hesterville, all in Attala County.

Mississippi 442 – Begins at Mississippi 448 one mile east of Shaw, Sunflower County, thence in an easterly direction to Steiner, thence in a northerly direction to Linn, thence in an easterly direction to Doddsville and extends easterly to U.S. 49E near Schalter, Leflore County.

Mississippi 444 – Begins at Mississippi 1 at or near Round Lake in Bolivar County, thence easterly to intersect U.S. 61 at or near Duncan, Bolivar County.

Mississippi 446 – Begins at Mississippi 1 at or near Lobdell and extends east to U.S. 61 at or near Boyle, all in Bolivar County.

Mississippi 448 – Begins at or near Benoit, Bolivar County, and extends southeast to or near Shaw, thence in a southeasterly direction to join U.S. 82 at or near Indianola, Sunflower County.

Mississippi 450 – Begins at or near Scott on Mississippi 1 and runs in a southeasterly direction to Choctaw on U.S. 61, all in Bolivar County.

Mississippi 454 – Begins at or near the Mississippi River Bridge southwest of Greenville and extends east to Mississippi 1 north of Wayside, all in Washington County.

Mississippi 462 – Begins on U.S. 61, three miles north of Port Gibson, thence in a northerly direction to a point at or near Willows, being a part of road connecting U.S. 61 and Mississippi 27 formerly Mississippi 3, all in Claiborne County.

Mississippi 463 – Begins on Mississippi 22 at or near Livingston, thence southeasterly to U.S. 51 at or near Madison, all in Madison County.

Mississippi 465 – Begins at Mississippi 1 near Fitler, Issaquena County, thence southerly via Brunswick and Eagle Lake to U.S. 61 north of Redwood, Warren County.

Mississippi 467 – Begins at or near Edwards and extends southeast to or near Raymond, all in Hinds County.

Mississippi 468 – Begins three miles north of U.S. 80 on the Fannin Road thence south to U.S. 80, thence in a southeasterly direction to Whitfield, and thence in a northeasterly direction to or near Brandon, all in Rankin County.

Mississippi 469 – Begins on Mississippi 28 at or near Fork Church, Simpson County, thence northerly to Harrisville, Florence and extends northeasterly to intersect Mississippi 468, Rankin County.

Mississippi 471 – Begins at or near Brandon and extends in a northerly direction to Mississippi 25, thence from a point seven and five-tenths miles northeast on Mississippi 25 to intersect Sand Hill-Canton Road or Mississippi 43, all in Rankin County.

Mississippi 472 – Begins approximately two miles east of Hazlehurst, Copiah County, on Old Mississippi 28 near Shady Grove, thence in a southeasterly direction to Rockport; thence begins again in Section 23, Township 10 North, Range 21 West, Simpson County, thence in a northeasterly direction to Mississippi 28 at or near Pinola.

Mississippi 473 – Begins at a point on the Copiah-Hinds county line northeast of Crystal Springs, thence northerly to new U.S. 51 near Terry, Hinds County.
